Utah statutes.
63G-11-104.   Receipt of state, local, or federal public benefits --
Verification -- Exceptions -- Fraudulently obtaining benefits -- Criminal
penalties -- Annual report.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (3) or where exempted by federal law, an
agency or political subdivision of the state shall verify the lawful presence
in the United States of an individual at least 18 years of age who has applied
for:
(a)  a state or local public benefit as defined in 8 U.S.C., Sec. 1621; or
(b)  a federal public benefit as defined in 8 U.S.C., Sec. 1611, that is
administered by an agency or political subdivision of this state.
(2)  This section shall be enforced without regard to race, religion, gender,
ethnicity, or national origin.
(3)  Verification of lawful presence under this section is not required for:
(a)  any purpose for which lawful presence in the United States is not
restricted by law, ordinance, or regulation;
(b)  assistance for health care items and services that are necessary for the
treatment of an emergency medical condition, as defined in 42 U.S.C., Sec.
1396b(v)(3), of the individual involved and are not related to an organ
transplant procedure;
(c)  short-term, noncash, in-kind emergency disaster relief;
(d)  public health assistance for immunizations with respect to immunizable
diseases and for testing and treatment of symptoms of communicable diseases
whether or not the symptoms are caused by the communicable disease;
(e)  programs, services, or assistance such as soup kitchens, crisis
counseling and intervention, and short-term shelter, specified by the United
States Attorney General, in the sole and unreviewable discretion of the United
States Attorney General after consultation with appropriate federal agencies
and departments, which:
(i)  deliver in-kind services at the community level, including through public
or private nonprofit agencies;
(ii)  do not condition the provision of assistance, the amount of assistance
provided, or the cost of assistance provided on the income or resources of the
individual recipient; and
(iii)  are necessary for the protection of life or safety;
(f)  the exemption for paying the nonresident portion of total tuition as set
forth in Section 53B-8-106;
(g)  an applicant for a license under Section 61-1-4, if the applicant is
registered with the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority and files an
application with the state Division of Securities through the Central
Registration Depository;
(h)  a state public benefit to be given to an individual under Title 49, Utah
State Retirement and Insurance Benefit Act;
(i)  a home loan that will be insured, guaranteed, or purchased by:
(i)  the Federal Housing Administration, the Veterans Administration, or any
other federal agency; or
(ii)  an enterprise as defined in 12 U.S.C., Sec. 4502; and
(j)  a subordinate loan or a grant that will be made to an applicant in
connection with a home loan that does not require verification under
Subsection (3)(i).
(4)  An agency or political subdivision required to verify the lawful presence
in the United States of an applicant under this section shall require the
applicant to certify under penalty of perjury that:
(a)  the applicant is a United States citizen; or
(b)  the applicant is:
(i)  a qualified alien as defined in 8 U.S.C., Sec. 1641; and
(ii)  lawfully present in the United States.
(5)  An agency or political subdivision shall verify a certification required
under Subsection (4)(b) through the Systematic Alien Verification for
Entitlements Program, hereafter referred to in this section as the "program,"
operated by the United States Department of Homeland Security or an equivalent
program designated by the Department of Homeland Security.
(6) (a)  An individual who knowingly and willfully makes a false, fictitious,
or fraudulent statement or representation in a certification under Subsection
(4) is subject to the criminal penalties applicable in this state for:
(i)  making a written false statement under Subsection 76-8-504(2); and
(ii)  fraudulently obtaining public assistance program benefits under Sections
76-8-1205 and 76-8-1206 or unemployment compensation under Section 76-8-1301.
(b)  If the certification constitutes a false claim of U.S. citizenship under
18 U.S.C., Sec. 911, the agency or political subdivision shall file a
complaint with the United States Attorney General for the applicable district
based upon the venue in which the application was made.
(7)  An agency or political subdivision may adopt variations to the
requirements of this section which:
(a)  clearly improve the efficiency of or reduce delay in the verification
process; or
(b)  provide for adjudication of unique individual circumstances where the
verification procedures in this section would impose an unusual hardship on a
legal resident of Utah.
(8)  It is unlawful for an agency or a political subdivision of this state to
provide a state, local, or federal benefit, as defined in 8 U.S.C., Sec. 1611
and Sec. 1621, in violation of the provisions of this section.
(9)  Each state agency or department that administers a program of state or
local public benefits shall:
(a)  provide an annual report to the governor, the president of the Senate,
and the speaker of the House regarding its compliance with this section; and
(b) (i)  monitor the program for application verification errors and
significant delays;
(ii)  provide an annual report on the errors and delays to ensure that the
application of the program is not erroneously denying a state or local benefit
to a legal resident of the state; and
(iii)  report delays and errors in the program to the United States Department
of Homeland Security.
